Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-107
Alcohol or substance abuse, defined.

Alcohol or substance abuse means a maladaptive pattern of alcohol or substance use leading to clinically significant impairment or distress as manifested by one or more of the following occurring at any time during the same twelve-month period:

(1) Recurrent alcohol or substance use resulting in a failure to fulfill major role obligations at work, school, or home;

(2) Recurrent alcohol or substance use in situations in which it is physically hazardous;

(3) Recurrent legal problems related to alcohol or substance use; or

(4) Continued alcohol or substance use despite having persistent or recurrent social or interpersonal problems caused or exacerbated by the effects of the alcohol or substance use.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 7.